Washington statutes.
RCW 41.72.030

Law enforcement medal of honor awarded—When.

The state law enforcement medal of honor shall be awarded to recipients during the national law enforcement recognition week. The governor may delegate the awarding of the medal to the lieutenant governor or the attorney general.

[ 1994 c 89 s 3.]